Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 3. Nonresident and Zone Registration

§ 411.
Repealed. 2015, No. 158 (Adj. Sess.), § 62.

§ 412.
Repealed.
1975, No. 218 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. Oct. 1, 1976.

§ 412a.
Repealed. 2011, No. 46, § 17.

§ 413.
Repealed. 2015, No. 50, § 29.

§ 414.
Special permits for foreign public utilities.

The Commissioner may issue to public utilities operating in this State, for a nominal fee, a special permit for vehicles engaged in emergency repair work in this State, provided such vehicles are registered in some other state, have registration plates attached, and are driven by an individual licensed to operate motor vehicles in this or some other state.

HISTORY:

Amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 151.

§ 415.
Nondiesel fuel user’s license.

In addition to any other provision of law relating to registration of motor trucks with a gross weight of 18,000 pounds or over and powered by gasoline or any other nondiesel fuel, or fees paid therefor, a person owning or operating a motor truck upon the highways of the State, registered in this State, shall apply to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles for a nondiesel fuel user’s license for each such motor truck to be so operated. Application shall be made upon a form prescribed by such Commissioner and shall set forth such information as the Commissioner may require. The application shall be accompanied by a license fee of $6.50 for each motor truck listed in the application. However, any license issued under this section prior to July 1, 1990 shall remain in effect for the term of the issuance. The Commissioner shall issue a license and an identification tag, plate, or sticker for each such motor truck, which tag, plate, or sticker shall be of such size and design and contain such information as the Commissioner shall prescribe. Except as otherwise provided, any such license and tag, plate, or sticker shall become void on January 1 next following the date of issue. Such licenses shall be carried in the motor truck, and the tag, plate, or sticker shall be affixed to said motor truck and at all times be visible and legible. This section shall not apply to motor trucks owned by federal, State, provincial, or municipal governments nor to motor trucks, otherwise required to be licensed under this section, that are being operated under the provisions of sections 463 or 516 of this title.

A person owning or operating a motor truck as defined in subsection (a) of this section that is registered in this State and for which the fees required under section 367 of this title have been paid shall not be required to obtain the license or pay the fee as required in subsection 367(a) of this title until his or her next registration renewal and annually thereafter.

[Repealed.]

Upon approval of the Commissioner, one-way rental vehicles with a gross vehicle weight of 26,000 pounds or less are exempt from carrying the nondiesel fuel user’s license in the motor vehicle and are exempt from displaying the identification tag, plate, or sticker on or in the motor vehicle.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), eff. March 25, 1970;

1971, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1975, No. 218

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Oct. 1, 1976;

1977, No. 12

, § 1, eff. March 14, 1977;

1981, No. 87

, § 18, eff. June 1, 1981;

1981, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1985, No. 58

, § 10;

1985, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. April 18, 1986;

1987, No. 109

, § 1;

1987, No. 283

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1989, No. 46

, § 1, eff. May 5, 1989;

1989, No. 51

, § 27;

1989, No. 51

, § 27a, eff. July 1, 1990;

1991, No. 137

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1993, No. 210

(Adj. Sess.), § 256a;

1993, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 415a.
Repealed.
1981, No. 172 (Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. Dec. 1, 1982.

§ 416.
Suspension and revocation.

The Commissioner, for cause, may deny a permit or suspend or revoke any permit issued by him or her.
Hearings on any action by the Commissioner under this section may be had pursuant to the provisions of sections 105-107 of this title.

§§ 417-419.
Repealed. 2013, No. 189 (Adj. Sess.), § 27.

§ 420.
Motor truck defined.

As used in sections 415, 416, 420, and 421 of this title, the words “motor truck” shall include any motor vehicle having a gross weight of 18,000 pounds or over, designed and used for the transportation of merchandise or freight.

§ 421.
Penalties.

It shall be unlawful for any person:

to operate a motor truck subject to the provisions of this chapter upon any public highway in the State without first obtaining the license and tag, plate, or marker required under section 415 of this title or to so operate without carrying the license and displaying the tag, plate, or marker if issued;

[Repealed.]

to fail to file any return or report required by the Commissioner; or

to make a false return or fail to keep records of operations as may be required by the Commissioner.

Any person who violates any provision of subsection (a) of this section, upon first conviction, shall be punishable by a civil penalty of not less than $100.00 or more than $250.00; and upon a second or subsequent conviction of a violation occurring within one year after a previous conviction of any provision of subsection (a), by a fine of not less than $250.00 or more than $500.00 or by imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 218

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. Oct. 1, 1976;

1977, No. 12

, § 4, eff. March 14, 1977;

1979, No. 34

, § 5, eff. Nov. 1, 1979; 1981 (Adj. Sess.), No. 172, § 8, eff. March 1, 1983;

1985, No. 58

, § 8;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 152.

§ 422.
Repealed. 2013, No. 189 (Adj. Sess.), § 27.

§ 423.
Repealed. 2015, No. 158 (Adj. Sess.), § 78(2).